Washington statutes.
RCW 13.34.340

Release of records—Disclosure to treating physician.

For minors who cannot consent to the release of their records with the department because they are not old enough to consent to treatment, or, if old enough, lack the capacity to consent, or if the minor is receiving treatment involuntarily with a provider the department has authorized to provide mental health treatment under RCW 13.34.320, the department shall disclose, upon the treating physician's request, all relevant records, including the minor's passport as established under RCW 74.13.285, in the department's possession that the treating physician determines contain information required for treatment of the minor. The treating physician shall maintain all records received from the department in a manner that distinguishes the records from any other records in the minor's file with the treating physician and the department records may not be disclosed by the treating physician to any other person or entity absent a court order except that, for medical purposes only, a treating physician may disclose the department records to another treating physician.

[ 2018 c 284 s 27; 2009 c 520 s 42; 2000 c 122 s 35; 1999 c 188 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—1999 c 188: See note following RCW 13.34.320.